Utah statutes.
26-42-102.   Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

(1)  "Commission" means the Utah State Tax Commission.

(2)  "Employee" means an employee of a licensee.

(3)  "Enforcing agency" means the state Department of Health, or any local health department enforcing the provisions of this chapter.

(4)  "Licensee" means a person licensed:

(a)  under Section 59-14-201 to sell cigarettes at retail; or

(b)  under Section 59-14-301 to sell tobacco products at retail.

(5)  "License to sell tobacco" or "license" means a license issued:

(a)  under Section 59-14-201 to sell cigarettes at retail; or

(b)  under Section 59-14-301 to sell tobacco products at retail.

(6)  "Tobacco" means cigarettes or tobacco products as defined in Section 59-14-102.



Enacted by Chapter 319, 1998 General Session

